Hawaii statutes.
§87A-42 Other post-employment benefits
trust. (a) Notwithstanding sections 87A-31 and 87A-31.5, the board, upon
terms and conditions set by the board, shall establish and administer a
separate trust fund for the purpose of receiving employer contributions that
will prefund other post-employment health and other benefit plan costs for
retirees and their beneficiaries. The separate trust fund shall meet the
requirements of the Government Accounting Standards Board regarding other
post-employment benefits trusts. The board shall establish and maintain a
separate account for each public employer within the separate trust fund to
accept and account for each public employer's contributions. Employer
contributions to the separate trust fund shall be irrevocable, all assets of
the fund shall be dedicated exclusively to providing health and other benefits
to retirees and their beneficiaries, and assets of the fund shall not be
subject to appropriation for any other purpose and shall not be subject to
claims by creditors of the employers or the board or plan administrator. The
board's powers under section 87A-24 shall also apply to the fund established
pursuant to this section.

(b) Public employer contributions shall be
paid into the fund in each fiscal year, and commencing with the 2018-2019
fiscal year, the amount of the annual public employer contribution shall be
equal to the amount of the annual required contribution, as determined by an
actuary retained by the board.

(c) In any fiscal year subsequent to the
2017-2018 fiscal year in which the state public employer's contributions into
the fund are less than the amount of the annual required contribution, the
amount that represents the excess of the annual required contribution over the
state public employer's contributions shall be deposited into the appropriate
account of the separate trust fund from a portion of all general excise tax
revenues collected by the department of taxation under section 237-31.

If any general excise tax revenues are
deposited into the separate trust fund in any fiscal year as a result of this
subsection, the director of finance shall notify the legislature and governor
whether the general fund expenditure ceiling for that fiscal year would have
been exceeded if those revenues had been legislatively appropriated instead of
deposited without appropriation into the trust fund. The notification shall be
submitted within thirty days following the end of the applicable fiscal year.

(d) In any fiscal year subsequent to the
2017-2018 fiscal year in which a county public employer's contributions into
the fund are less than the amount of the annual required contribution, the
amount that represents the excess of the annual required contribution over the
county public employer's contributions shall be deposited into the fund from a
portion of all transient accommodations tax revenues collected by the
department of taxation under section 237D-6.5(b)(4). The director of finance
shall deduct the amount necessary to meet the county public employer's annual
required contribution from the revenues derived under section 237D-6.5(b)(4)
and transfer the amount to the board for deposit into the appropriate account
of the separate trust fund.

(e) In any fiscal year subsequent to fiscal
year 2017-2018 in which a public employer's contributions into the fund are
less than the amount of the annual required contribution and the public
employer is not entitled to transient accommodations tax revenues sufficient to
satisfy the total amount of the annual required contribution, the public
employer's contributions shall be deposited into the fund from portions of any
other revenues collected on behalf of the public employer or held by the
State. The director of finance shall deduct the amount necessary to meet the
public employer's annual required contribution from any revenues collected on
behalf of the public employer held by the State and transfer the amount to the
board for deposit into the appropriate account of the separate trust fund.

(f) For the purposes of this section,
"annual required contribution" means a public employer's required
contribution to the trust fund established in this section that is sufficient
to cover:

(1) The normal cost, which is the cost of other
post-employment benefits attributable to the current year of service; and

(2) An amortization payment, which is a catch-up
payment for past service costs to fund the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
over the next thirty years. [L 2012, c 304, §1; am L 2013, c 268, §8; am L
2015, c 121, §4]

Note

Conditional repeal of L 2015, c 121, on January 1, 2016. L
2015, c 121, §17(1).

Authorization to create fund requires Government Accounting
Standards Board requirements. L 2012, c 304, §2.

Public employer contributions into trust fund (fiscal period
2014-2019) L 2013, c 268, §11.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next